District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Small and Local Business Credit Enhancement Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. The Small, Local, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development and
Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-
218.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 2316 to read as follows:
“§ 2316. Small and local business credit enhancement program.
“(a) There is established within the Department a Small and Local Business Credit
Enhancement Program (“Program”), to provide to qualifying businesses rent guarantees and
other credit enhancement services as determined by the Department.


“(b) The Department shall maintain a Small and Local Business Underwriting Registry
(“Registry”), listing local business enterprises and small business enterprises that are eligible to
receive credit enhancement services from the Department.
“(c) To be placed on the Registry, a local business enterprise or small business enterprise
shall provide to the Department, on an annual basis and in a form determined by the Department,
information sufficient to determine creditworthiness, including:
“(1) For a local business enterprise or small business enterprise that has been
operating for at least 2 years:
“(A) Corporate tax returns for the previous 2 years;
“(B) The local business enterprise or small business enterprise owner’s
individual tax returns for the previous 2 years;
“(C) The local business enterprise or small business enterprise owner’s
personal financial statement, including a listing of all assets and liabilities; and
“(D) A financial statement for the local business enterprise or small
business enterprise, including:
“(i) A profit and loss statement;
“(ii) Balance sheet; and
“(iii) A listing of accounts receivable and accounts payable; or
“(2) For a local business enterprise or small business enterprise that has been
operating for fewer than 2 years:
“(A) All corporate tax returns;
“(B) The local business enterprise or small business enterprise owner’s
individual tax returns for the previous 2 years;


“(C) The local business enterprise or small business enterprise owner’s
personal financial statement, including a listing of all assets and liabilities;
“(D) A financial statement for the local business enterprise or small
business enterprise, including:
“(i) A profit and loss statement;
“(ii) Balance sheet; and
“(iii) A listing of accounts receivable and accounts payable;
“(E) A business plan; and
“(F) Evidence of the business owner’s management experience or other
experience relevant to the business plan.
“(d) If the Department determines, pursuant to publicly available criteria adopted by
rulemaking, that the information provided by a local business enterprise or small business
enterprise pursuant to subsection (c) of this section demonstrates an acceptable level of risk, the
Department shall place the local business enterprise or small business enterprise on the Registry.
“(e) A local business enterprise or small business enterprise listed on the Registry shall be
eligible to apply for rent guarantees, as follows:
“(1) The Department may provide a certification to a property owner that, in the
event a local business enterprise or small business enterprise listed on the Registry is unable to
pay rent and the property owner is unable to mitigate the lost rent, the Department will provide
payments, pursuant to the terms of a lease between the property owner and the local business
enterprise or small business enterprise listed on the Registry, to the property owner for up to 3
years as follows:
“(A) In the first year of the lease, 100% of the rent owed;


“(B) In the second year of the lease, 50% of the rent owed; and
“(C) In the third year of the lease, 25% of the rent owed.
“(2) The Department shall not provide a certification to a property owner pursuant
to paragraph (1) of this subsection after the qualifying business is obligated to make payments
pursuant to a lease with the property owner, or if the local business enterprise or small business
enterprise listed on the Registry has at any other time been obligated to make payments pursuant
to a lease between the qualifying local business and the local business enterprise or small
business enterprise listed on the Registry.
“(3) Before receiving a certification pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, a
property owner shall provide the Department a certification, in a form determined by the
Department, that but for the rent guarantee, the property owner would not enter into a lease
agreement with the local business enterprise or small business enterprise listed on the Registry.
“(4) The Department shall not make a payment pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection if the property owner has not made a good faith effort to replace the local business
enterprise or small business enterprise listed on the Registry.
“(5) The payment made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not
exceed 110% of the average commercial rent per square foot for the census tract where the
qualifying business is located.
100 “(f) Within 90 days after the effective date of the Small and Local Business Credit
101 Enhancement Amendment Act of 2025, introduced November 3, 2025, and annually thereafter,
102 the Department shall publish on its website a list of the average commercial rent per square foot
103 for each census tract.
104 “(g) The Department may provide other credit enhancement services.”.


105 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
106 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
107 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
108 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
109 Sec. 4. Effective date.
110 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
111 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
112 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
113 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
114 Columbia Register.